District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.08

Chief of Police to make quarterly reports.

The Chief of Police shall make to the Mayor quarterly reports in writing of the state of the Police District, with such statistics and suggestions as he may deem advisable for the improvement of the police government and discipline of said District.

R.S., D.C., § 346
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 6

History

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-63

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 4-123.
1973 Ed., § 4-127.

Prior Codifications

Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.

Editor's Notes

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government